Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3577
Hospital districts; merger; new officers; board of directors; elected; term.

Immediately following the entry of the order of merger by the county board, the members of the board of directors of the former hospital districts which were merged by such order shall meet and elect from among themselves a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary-treasurer. No more than two of such offices may be held by persons from one of such former hospital districts. The members of such boards shall adopt as rules for its proceeding the rules of one of such former districts with such changes and modifications as the members shall deem necessary. The members of the board of directors shall continue to serve as members of the board of directors of the merged district until the next statewide primary, at which time a board of directors, consisting of five members, shall be elected from the merged district for staggered terms of two for two years and three for four years in the manner prescribed for the election of an original board under section 23-3534.

Laws 1978, LB 560, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.127.